Georgia, session 2025_26, HB260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 1 of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to property tax exemptions, is amended by revising Code Section 48-5-44, relating
to exemption of homestead occupied by owner and effect of participation in rural housing
program on homestead exemption, and limits, as follows:
"48-5-44.
The homestead of each resident of this state actually occupied by the owner as a residence
and homestead shall be exempted from all ad valorem taxation for state, county, and school
purposes, except taxes levied by municipalities for school purposes and except to pay
interest on and to retire bonded indebtedness, for as long as the residence and homestead
H. B. 260
- 1 -

LC 50 1052
is actually occupied by the owner primarily as a residence and homestead. The exemption
shall not exceed $2,000.00 $5,000.00 of the value of the homestead. Should the owner of
a dwelling house on a farm who is already entitled to a homestead exemption participate
in the program of rural housing and obtain a new house under contract with the local
housing authority, he or she shall be entitled to receive the same homestead exemption as
allowed before making the contract. Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, the
value of all homestead property in excess of $2,000.00 $5,000.00 shall remain subject to
taxation. The exemption shall be returned and claimed in the manner prescribed by law.
This exemption shall not apply to taxes levied by municipalities."
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
The Secretary of State shall call and conduct an election as provided in this section for the
purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of the entire state for approval or rejection. The
Secretary of State shall conduct such election no later than the Tuesday next following the
first Monday in November, 2026, and shall issue the call and conduct such election as
provided by general law. The Secretary of State shall cause the date and purpose of the
election to be published once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof
in the official organ of each county in the state. The ballot shall have written or printed
thereon the words:
H. B. 260
- 2 -

LC 50 1052
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which increases from $2,000.00 of the value of
( ) NO the homestead to $5,000.00 of the value of the homestead a state-wide
homestead exemption from property taxes for state, county, and school
purposes, other than for municipal school purposes or to pay interest on and
retire bonded indebtedness?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
effect on January 1, 2027. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective and this Act shall
be automatically repealed on the first day of January immediately following such election
date. It shall be the duty of each county election superintendent to certify the results thereof
to the Secretary of State.
SECTION 4.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 260
- 3 -